Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 5. South Pass City State Historic Site

§ 36-8-501.
South Pass City state historic site.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

Upon approval by the governor, the department of state parks and cultural resources may purchase in the name of the state of Wyoming the following real property, unless the Carissa gold mine has created unacceptable economical environmental impacts as shown by the department of environmental quality investigation and determined by the governor, in Fremont county containing approximately 312.41 acres which are hereby declared to be part of the South Pass City state historic site:

In township 29 north, range 100 west, 6th p.m., SE1/4 SE1/4 NE1/4, NE1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4 of section 20; lots 6, 7, 9, 16, 19 and 24 of section 20; W1/2 SW1/4 NW1/4 of section 21; E1/2 SW1/4 NW1/4 of section 21; and W1/4 SE1/4 NW1/4 of section 21.

The lands in Fremont County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as South Pass City are designated as the South Pass City state historic site. The department shall by rule specify the legal description of the historic site.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 86, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 36-180.10; Laws 1973, ch. 245, §§ 3, 5; 2003, ch. 193, § 1; 2009, ch. 7, § 1; 2010, ch. 11, §§ 2, 3; ch. 82, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “312.41” for “216.46” in the introductory language of (b); and inserted “lots 6, 7, 9, 16, 19 and 24 of section 20” in (b)(i).

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch 11, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (a) pertaining to powers of preserve; and added (c).

The second 2010 amendment, by ch 82, § 3, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “South Pass City state historic site” for “Old South Pass Historical Preserve-Wyoming” at the end of introductory language of (b).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

Old South Pass historical preserve commission. —

The powers, duties and functions of the Old South Pass historical preserve commission have been transferred to the parks and cultural resources commission, and the Old South Pass historical preserve commission has been abolished. See §§

36-4-101

and

36-4-119

.

There is no paragraph (b)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 7, § 2, provides:

“(a)

The department of environmental quality is authorized to submit a grant application to the United States office of surface mining for distribution of a portion of Wyoming's share of abandoned mine land funds from the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act Amendments of 2006, Section 411(h)(i), pursuant to 2007 H.R. 6111, for the period ending June 30, 2010, for the following project:

“(i)

Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000.00) for the remediation costs associated with the property transferred to the state of Wyoming pursuant to section 1 of this act.

“(b)

Notwithstanding W.S.

35-11-1210

, grant funds received for the project authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may, but are not required to be, deposited into the state abandoned mine land funds reserve account pursuant to W.S.

35-11-1210

. All funds received from the authorized grants are appropriated to the department of environmental quality in the amounts specified in subsection (a) of this section to be expended for the purposes set forth.

“(c)

The legislature accepts the transfer of lands located at township 29 north, range 100 west, 6th p.m., lots 6, 7, 9, 16, 19 and 24 of section 20 from the bureau of land management to the department of state parks and cultural resources upon the completion of all acts necessary to comply with the requirements of a land patent transfer from the bureau of land management pursuant to the federal Recreational and Public Purposes Act.

“(d)

The legislature accepts the transfer of lands located at township 29 north, range 100 west, 6th p.m., lots 6, 7, 9, 16, 19 and 24 of section 20 from the bureau of land management to the department of state parks and cultural resources upon the completion of all acts necessary to comply with the requirements of a land patent transfer from the bureau of land management pursuant to the federal Recreational and Public Purposes Act.”

§ 36-8-502.
Corporate powers.

Except as herein limited the preserve shall have powers like a corporation as provided in the Wyoming Business Corporation Act and by law for nonprofit corporations.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 86, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 36-180.11.

Cross references. —

As to nonprofit corporations, see chapter 19 of title 17.

Old South Pass historical preserve commission. —

See note following §

36-8-501

.

Wyoming Business Corporation Act. —

See §

17-16-101

et seq.